New York, session 2025-2026, A9483.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 390-a of the social services law, 2 as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social services 3 law relating to training certain staff accepting registrations, issuing 4 licenses or conducting inspections of child day care homes, programs or 5 facilities on the recognition of controlled substances, as proposed in 6 legislative bills numbers S. 6226 and A. 1382, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 1. All office of children and family services and municipal staff 9 employed to accept registrations, issue licenses or conduct inspections 10 of child day care homes, programs or facilities, subject to the amounts 11 appropriated therefor, shall receive: (a) training in at least the 12 following: regulations promulgated by the office of children and family 13 services pursuant to section three hundred ninety of this title; child 14 abuse prevention and identification; safety and security procedures in 15 child day care settings[, which shall include recognizing the presence 16 of controlled substances as defined under section thirty-three hundred 17 six of the public health law]; the principles of childhood development, 18 and the laws, regulations and procedures governing the protection of 19 children from abuse or maltreatment; and (b) guidance on identification EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03908-02-6 A. 9483 2 1 of circumstances that may indicate the presence of controlled substances 2 and referrals to law enforcement. 3 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social 4 services law relating to training certain staff accepting registrations, 5 issuing licenses or conducting inspections of child day care homes, 6 programs or facilities on the recognition of controlled substances, as 7 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6226 and A. 1382, is amended to 8 read as follows: 9 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] on the one hundred 10 eightieth day after it shall have become a law. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 12 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 13 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the social 14 services law relating to training certain staff accepting registrations, 15 issuing licenses or conducting inspections of child day care homes, 16 programs or facilities on the recognition of controlled substances, as 17 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6226 and A. 1382, takes effect.